District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.10

Delegation and redelegation of authority.

The Department and its Director shall be the successors to all intellectual and developmental disabilities-related authority delegated to the DHS and its Director, and the Director of the Department shall be authorized to act, either personally or through a designated representative, as a member of any committees, commissions, boards, or other bodies that include as a member the Director of the DHS with respect to intellectual and developmental disabilities-related authority.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 110, 54 DCR 818
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 15(d), 59 DCR 5567
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.
Establishment of the State Independent Living Council as an Independent Commission, see Mayor’s Order 2010-105, June 25, 2010 ( 57 DCR 5554).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 110 of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 twice substituted “intellectual” for “mental retardation”.